District of Columbia statutes.
7-2361.05

Recognition of volunteer health practitioners licensed in other states.

(a)

While an emergency declaration is in effect, a volunteer health practitioner registered with a registration system that complies with § 7-2361.04 and licensed and in good standing in the state upon which the practitioner’s registration is based may practice in the District to the extent authorized by this chapter as if the practitioner were licensed in the District.

(b)

A volunteer health practitioner qualified under subsection (a) of this section is not entitled to the protections of this chapter if the practitioner is licensed in more than one state and any license of the practitioner is suspended, revoked, or subject to an agency order limiting or restricting practice privileges, or has been voluntarily terminated under threat of sanction.

History

July 1, 2010, D.C. Law 18-184, § 6, 57 DCR 3655

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act.